Utah statutes.
32A-4-201 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Commission's power to grant licenses --
Limitations.
(1)  Before an airport lounge may sell or allow the consumption of liquor on
its premises, it shall first obtain a license from the commission as provided
in this part.
(2)  The commission may issue airport lounge liquor licenses for the purpose
of establishing airport liquor outlets at international airports for the
storage, sale, and consumption of liquor on premises operated as public
airport lounges.
(3)  The total number of airport lounge liquor licenses may not exceed one
lounge per terminal plus one lounge per concourse located beyond the security
point at that international airport.
